District of Columbia statutes.
9-812

Appropriations authorized.

There is hereby authorized to be appropriated such sum as may be necessary for the construction of the airport authorized by this chapter, and such sum shall remain available until expended. There are hereby authorized to be appropriated such other sums as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 773, ch. 905, § 12
July 11, 1958, 72 Stat. 354, Pub. L. 85-511, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1212.
1973 Ed., § 7-1412.